North Carolina, session 2025, SB904.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

SNAP ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS FUNDING
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support, the sum of sixteen
million dollars ($16,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. These
funds shall be used to cover the loss in federal receipts for the administrative costs of the federal
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), as a result of Public Law 119-21. The
Department may allocate a portion of these appropriated funds to any division within the
Department that incurs a loss of federal receipts for the administrative costs of SNAP as a result
of Public Law 119-21. The Department shall only spend the portion of these appropriated funds
up to the actual amount of lost federal receipts.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, the sum of sixty-nine million dollars
($69,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to cover the loss of
federal receipts for the administrative costs of the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program (SNAP), as a result of Public Law 119-21. The Division of Social Services shall
distribute these funds to counties proportional to each county's loss of federal receipts. The
Division of Social Services shall only spend the portion of these appropriated funds up to the
actual amount of lost federal receipts.

FUNDS TO EXAMINE ERROR RATE/SNAP
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), the sum of ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to develop and implement a
request for proposal (RFP) process that provides grants to entities that have innovative proposals
or projects to examine ways to reduce the payment error rate regarding the food and nutrition
services program. The Division shall establish criteria for grant awards and the maximum
amounts for each grant.
*S904-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 904-First Edition